Maine, session 132, LD604.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Concurrent methadone treatment and intensive outpatient programs
1. Concurrent services. The department may not prohibit coverage of or otherwise
restrict coverage for individuals enrolled in the MaineCare program from receiving
methadone maintenance for the treatment of opioid use disorder and from concurrently
participating in medically appropriate intensive outpatient programs and other outpatient
services intended for the treatment of substance use disorder or behavioral health disorders.
2. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section no later
than 90 days after the effective date of this section. Rules adopted under this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.